Wisconsin, session 2025, SB266.
do enact as follows:SB266,11Section 1. 939.616 (title) of the statutes is amended to read:SB266,2,32939.616 (title) Mandatory minimum sentence for child sex offenses 3and child trafficking.SB266,24Section 2. 939.616 (1s) of the statutes is created to read:SB266,2,85939.616 (1s) If a person is convicted of a violation of s. 948.051, the court shall 6impose a bifurcated sentence under s. 973.01. The term of confinement in prison 7portion of the bifurcated sentence shall be at least 15 years. Otherwise the 8penalties for the crime apply, subject to any applicable penalty enhancement.SB266,39Section 3. 939.6175 of the statutes is created to read:SB266,2,1410939.6175 Minimum sentence for human trafficking. (1) If a person is 11convicted of a violation of s. 940.302, the court shall impose a bifurcated sentence 12under s. 973.01. The term of confinement in prison portion of the bifurcated 13sentence shall be at least 10 years. Otherwise the penalties for the crime apply, 14subject to any applicable penalty enhancement.SB266,415Section 4. 939.74 (2) (av) of the statutes is created to read:SB266,2,1716939.74 (2) (av) A prosecution for a violation of s. 940.302 may be commenced 17within 10 years after the commission of the violation.SB266,518Section 5. 940.302 (2) (a) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB266,3,21940.302 (2) (a) (intro.) Except as provided in s. 948.051, whoever knowingly 2engages in trafficking is guilty of a Class D C felony if all of the following apply:SB266,63Section 6. 940.302 (2) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB266,3,74940.302 (2) (b) Whoever benefits in any manner from a violation of par. (a) is 5guilty of a Class D C felony if the person knows or reasonably should have known 6that the benefits come from or are derived from an act or scheme described in par. 7(a).SB266,78Section 7. 948.051 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB266,3,129948.051 (1) Whoever knowingly recruits, entices, provides, obtains, harbors, 10transports, patronizes, or solicits or knowingly attempts to recruit, entice, provide, 11obtain, harbor, transport, patronize, or solicit any child for the purpose of 12commercial sex acts, as defined in s. 940.302 (1) (a), is guilty of a Class C B felony.SB266,813Section 8. 948.051 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:SB266,3,1614948.051 (2) Whoever benefits in any manner from a violation of sub. (1) is 15guilty of a Class C B felony if the person knows that the benefits come from an act 16described in sub. (1).SB266,3,1717